Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2571.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-925, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-925. Restoration of right to possess a firearm; mentally ill persons; petition A. A person may petition the court that entered an order, finding or adjudication that resulted in the person being a prohibited possessor as defined in section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 7  8, subdivision (a) or subject to 18 United States Code section 922(d)(4) or (g)(4) to restore the person's right to possess a firearm. B. The person or the person's guardian or attorney may file the petition.  The petition shall be served on the attorney for the state who appeared in the underlying case. C. On the filing of the petition the court shall set a hearing.  At the hearing, the person shall present psychological or psychiatric evidence in support of the petition.  The state shall provide the court with the person's criminal history records, if any.  The court shall receive evidence on and consider the following before granting or denying the petition: 1. The circumstances that resulted in the person being a prohibited possessor as defined in section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 7  8, subdivision (a) or subject to 18 United States Code section 922(d)(4) or (g)(4). 2. The person's record, including the person's mental health record and criminal history record, if any. 3. The person's reputation based on character witness statements, testimony or other character evidence. 4. Whether the person is a danger to self or others or has a persistent, acute or grave disabilities disability or whether the circumstances that led to the original order, adjudication or finding remain in effect. 5. Any change in the person's condition or circumstances that is relevant to the relief sought. 6. Any other evidence deemed admissible by the court. D. The petitioner shall prove by clear and convincing evidence both of the following: 1. The petitioner is not likely to act in a manner that is dangerous to public safety. 2. Granting the requested relief is not contrary to the public interest. E. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law. F. If the court grants the petition for relief, the original order, finding or adjudication is deemed not to have occurred for the purposes of applying section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 7 8, subdivision (a), Public Law 110-180, section 105(a) or 18 United States Code section 922(d)(4) or (g)(4) to that person. G. The granting of a petition under this section only restores the person's right to possess a firearm and does not apply to and has no effect on any other rights or benefits the person receives. H. The court shall promptly notify the supreme court and the department of public safety of an order granting a petition under this section. As soon thereafter as practicable the supreme court and the department shall update, correct, modify or remove the person's record in any database that the supreme court or the department maintains and makes available to the national instant criminal background check system consistent with the rules pertaining to the database.  Within ten business days after receiving the notification from the court, the department shall notify the United States attorney general that the person no longer falls within the provisions of section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 7  8, subdivision (a) or 18 United States Code section 922(d)(4) or (g)(4). END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 13-3101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3101. Definitions A. In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Deadly weapon" means anything that is designed for lethal use.  The term includes a firearm. 2. "Deface" means to remove, alter or destroy the manufacturer's serial number. 3. "Explosive" means any dynamite, nitroglycerine, black powder, or other similar explosive material, including plastic explosives.  Explosive does not include ammunition or ammunition components such as primers, percussion caps, smokeless powder, black powder and black powder substitutes used for hand loading purposes. 4. "Firearm" means any loaded or unloaded handgun, pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun or other weapon that will expel, is designed to expel or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive.  Firearm does not include a firearm in permanently inoperable condition. 5. "Improvised explosive device" means a device that incorporates explosives or destructive, lethal, noxious, pyrotechnic or incendiary chemicals and that is designed to destroy, disfigure, terrify or harass. 6. "MACHINE gun": (a) Means a weapon that shoots, is designed to shoot or can readily be restored to shoot automatically more than one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger. (b) Includes: (i) The frame or receiver of any such weapon. (ii) Any part that is designed and intended solely and exclusively, or any combination of parts that are designed and intended, for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun. (iii) Any combination of parts from which a machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the possession or under the control of a person. (c) Does not include items that are not required to be registered in the national firearms REGISTRATION and transfer record that is maintained by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, FIREARMS and explosives. 6. 7. "Occupied structure" means any building, object, vehicle, watercraft, aircraft or place with sides and a floor that is separately securable from any other structure attached to it, that is used for lodging, business, transportation, recreation or storage and in which one or more human beings either are or are likely to be present or so near as to be in equivalent danger at the time the discharge of a firearm occurs.  Occupied structure includes any dwelling house, whether occupied, unoccupied or vacant. 7. 8. "Prohibited possessor" means any person: (a) Who has been found to constitute a danger to self or to others or to have a persistent or acute disability or grave disability pursuant to court order pursuant to section 36-540, and whose right to possess a firearm has not been restored pursuant to section 13-925. (b) Who has been convicted within or without this state of a felony or who has been adjudicated delinquent for a felony and whose civil right to possess or carry a firearm has not been restored. (c) Who is at the time of possession serving a term of imprisonment in any correctional or detention facility. (d) Who is at the time of possession serving a term of probation pursuant to a conviction for a domestic violence offense as defined in section 13-3601 or a felony offense, parole, community supervision, work furlough, home arrest or release on any other basis or who is serving a term of probation or parole pursuant to the interstate compact under title 31, chapter 3, article 4.1. (e) Who is an undocumented alien or a nonimmigrant alien traveling with or without documentation in this state for business or pleasure or who is studying in this state and who maintains a foreign residence abroad.  This subdivision does not apply to: (i) Nonimmigrant aliens who possess a valid hunting license or permit that is lawfully issued by a state in the United States. (ii) Nonimmigrant aliens who enter the United States to participate in a competitive target shooting event or to display firearms at a sports or hunting trade show that is sponsored by a national, state or local firearms trade organization devoted to the competitive use or other sporting use of firearms. (iii) Certain diplomats. (iv) Officials of foreign governments or distinguished foreign visitors who are designated by the United States department of state. (v) Persons who have received a waiver from the United States attorney general. (f) Who has been found incompetent pursuant to rule 11, Arizona rules of criminal procedure, and who subsequently has not been found competent. (g) Who is found guilty except insane. 8. 9. "Prohibited weapon": (a) Includes the following: (i) An item that is a bomb, grenade, rocket having a propellant charge of more than four ounces or mine and that is explosive, incendiary or poison gas. (ii) A device that is designed, made or adapted to muffle the report of a firearm. (iii) A firearm that is capable of shooting more than one shot automatically, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger machine gun. (iv) A rifle with a barrel length of less than sixteen inches, or shotgun with a barrel length of less than eighteen inches, or any firearm that is made from a rifle or shotgun and that, as modified, has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches. (v) A breakable container that contains a flammable liquid with a flash point of one hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit or less and that has a wick or similar device capable of being ignited. (vi) A chemical or combination of chemicals, compounds or materials, including dry ice, that is possessed or manufactured for the purpose of generating a gas to cause a mechanical failure, rupture or bursting or an explosion or detonation of the chemical or combination of chemicals, compounds or materials. (vii) An improvised explosive device. (viii) Any combination of parts or materials that is designed and intended for use in making or converting a device into an item set forth in item (i), (v) or (vii) of this subdivision. (b) Does not include: (i) Any fireworks that are imported, distributed or used in compliance with state laws or local ordinances. (ii) Any propellant, propellant actuated devices or propellant actuated industrial tools that are manufactured, imported or distributed for their intended purposes. (iii) A device that is commercially manufactured primarily for the purpose of illumination. 9. 10. "Trafficking" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense or otherwise dispose of a weapon or explosive to another person, or to buy, receive, possess or obtain control of a weapon or explosive, with the intent to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense or otherwise dispose of the weapon or explosive to another person. B. The items set forth in subsection A, paragraph 8  9, subdivision (a), items (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this section do not include any firearms or devices that are possessed, manufactured or transferred in compliance with federal law. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 13-3110, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3110. Misconduct involving simulated explosive devices; classification; definition A. A person commits misconduct involving simulated explosive devices by intentionally giving or sending to another person or placing in a private or public place a simulated explosive device with the intent to terrify, intimidate, threaten or harass. B. The placing or sending of a simulated explosive device without written notice attached to the device in a conspicuous place that the device has been rendered inert and is possessed for the purpose of curio or relic collection, display or other similar purpose is prima facie evidence of intent to terrify, intimidate, threaten or harass. C. Misconduct involving simulated explosive devices is a class 5 felony. D. For the purposes of this section, "simulated explosive device" means a simulation of a prohibited weapon described in section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 8  9, subdivision (a), item (i), (v) or (vii) that a reasonable person would believe is such a prohibited weapon. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 13-3112, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3112. Concealed weapons; qualification; application; permit to carry; civil penalty; report; applicability; annual report A. The department of public safety shall issue a permit to carry a concealed weapon to a person who is qualified under this section. The person shall carry the permit at all times when the person is in actual possession of the concealed weapon and is required by section 4-229 or 4-244 to carry the permit. If the person is in actual possession of the concealed weapon and is required by section 4-229 or 4-244 to carry the permit, the person shall present the permit for inspection to any law enforcement officer on request. The department of public safety shall prioritize applications of in-state residents when issuing a permit to carry a concealed weapon. B. The permit of a person who is arrested or indicted for an offense that would make the person unqualified under section 13-3101, subsection A, paragraph 7  8 or this section shall be immediately suspended and seized. The permit of a person who becomes unqualified on conviction of that offense shall be revoked. The permit shall be restored on presentation of documentation from the court if the permittee is found not guilty or the charges are dismissed. The permit shall be restored on presentation of documentation from the county attorney that the charges against the permittee were dropped or dismissed. C. A permittee who carries a concealed weapon, who is required by section 4-229 or 4-244 to carry a permit and who fails to present the permit for inspection on the request of a law enforcement officer commits a violation of this subsection and is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $300. The department of public safety shall be notified of all violations of this subsection and shall immediately suspend the permit. A permittee shall not be convicted of a violation of this subsection if the permittee produces to the court a legible permit that is issued to the permittee and that was valid at the time the permittee failed to present the permit for inspection. D. A law enforcement officer shall not confiscate or forfeit a weapon that is otherwise lawfully possessed by a permittee whose permit is suspended pursuant to subsection C of this section, except that a law enforcement officer may take temporary custody of a firearm during an investigatory stop of the permittee. E. The department of public safety shall issue a permit to an applicant who meets all of the following conditions: 1. Is a resident of this state or a United States citizen. 2. Is twenty-one years of age or older or is at least nineteen years of age and provides evidence of current military service or proof of honorable discharge or general discharge under honorable conditions from the United States armed forces, the United States armed forces reserve or a state national guard. 3. Is not under indictment for and has not been convicted in any jurisdiction of a felony unless that conviction has been expunged, set aside or vacated or the applicant's rights have been restored and the applicant is currently not a prohibited possessor under state or federal law. 4. Does not suffer from mental illness and has not been adjudicated mentally incompetent or committed to a mental institution. 5. Is not unlawfully present in the United States. 6. Has ever demonstrated competence with a firearm as prescribed by subsection N of this section and provides adequate documentation that the person has satisfactorily completed a training program or demonstrated competence with a firearm in any state or political subdivision in the United States. For the purposes of this paragraph, "adequate documentation" means: (a) A current or expired permit issued by the department of public safety pursuant to this section. (b) An original or copy of a certificate, card or document that shows the applicant has ever completed any course or class prescribed by subsection N of this section or an affidavit from the instructor, school, club or organization that conducted or taught the course or class attesting to the applicant's completion of the course or class. (c) An original or a copy of a United States department of defense form 214 (DD-214) indicating an honorable discharge or general discharge under honorable conditions, a certificate of completion of basic training or any other document demonstrating proof of the applicant's current or former service in the United States armed forces as prescribed by subsection N, paragraph 5 of this section. (d) An original or a copy of a concealed weapon, firearm or handgun permit or a license as prescribed by subsection N, paragraph 6 of this section. F. The application shall be completed on a form prescribed by the department of public safety. The form shall not require the applicant to disclose the type of firearm for which a permit is sought. The applicant shall attest under penalty of perjury that all of the statements made by the applicant are true, that the applicant has been furnished a copy of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title and that the applicant is knowledgeable about the provisions contained in those chapters. The applicant shall submit the application to the department with any documentation prescribed by subsection E of this section, two sets of fingerprints and a reasonable fee determined by the director of the department. G. On receipt of a concealed weapon permit application, the department of public safety shall conduct a check of the applicant's criminal history record pursuant to section 41-1750. The department of public safety may exchange fingerprint card information with the federal bureau of investigation for federal criminal history record checks. H. The department of public safety shall complete all of the required qualification checks within sixty days after receiving the application and shall issue a permit within fifteen working days after completing the qualification checks if the applicant meets all of the conditions specified in subsection E of this section. If a permit is denied, the department of public safety shall notify the applicant in writing within fifteen working days after completing all of the required qualification checks and shall state the reasons why the application was denied. On receipt of the notification of the denial, the applicant has twenty days to submit any additional documentation to the department. On receipt of the additional documentation, the department shall reconsider its decision and inform the applicant within twenty days of the result of the reconsideration. If denied, the applicant shall be informed that the applicant may request a hearing pursuant to title 41, chapter 6, article 10. For the purposes of this subsection, "receiving the application" means the first day that the department has physical control of the application and that is presumed to be on the date of delivery as evidenced by proof of delivery by the United States postal service or a written receipt, which shall be provided by the department on request of the applicant. I. On issuance, a permit is valid for five years, except a permit that is held by a member of the United States armed forces, including a member of the Arizona national guard or a member of the reserves of any military establishment of the United States, who is on federal active duty and who is deployed overseas shall be extended until ninety days after the end of the member's overseas deployment. J. The department of public safety shall maintain a computerized permit record system that is accessible to criminal justice agencies for the purpose of confirming the permit status of any person who is contacted by a law enforcement officer and who claims to hold a valid permit issued by this state. This information and any other records that are maintained regarding applicants, permit holders or instructors shall not be available to any other person or entity except on an order from a state or federal court. A criminal justice agency shall not use the computerized permit record system to conduct inquiries on whether a person is a concealed weapons permit holder unless the criminal justice agency has reasonable suspicion to believe the person is carrying a concealed weapon and the person is subject to a lawful criminal investigation, arrest, detention or investigatory stop. K. A permit issued pursuant to this section is renewable every five years. At least sixty days before the expiration date of a permit, the department of public safety shall send a renewal reminder notice and renewal application form to the permit holder. Before a permit may be renewed, a criminal history records check shall be conducted pursuant to section 41-1750 within sixty days after receipt of the application for renewal. For the purposes of permit renewal, the permit holder is not required to submit additional fingerprints. L. Applications for renewal shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the director of the department of public safety. M. The department of public safety shall suspend or revoke a permit issued under this section if the permit holder becomes ineligible pursuant to subsection E of this section. The department of public safety shall notify the permit holder in writing within fifteen working days after the revocation or suspension and shall state the reasons for the revocation or suspension. N. An applicant shall demonstrate competence with a firearm through any of the following: 1. Completion of any firearms safety or training course or class that is available to the general public, that is offered by a law enforcement agency, a junior college, a college or a private or public institution, academy, organization or firearms training school and that is approved by the department of public safety or that uses instructors who are certified by the national rifle association. 2. Completion of any hunter education or hunter safety course approved by the Arizona game and fish department or a similar agency of another state. 3. Completion of any national rifle association firearms safety or training course. 4. Completion of any law enforcement firearms safety or training course or class that is offered for security guards, investigators, special deputies or other divisions or subdivisions of law enforcement or security enforcement and that is approved by the department of public safety. 5. Evidence of current military service or proof of honorable discharge or general discharge under honorable conditions from the United States armed forces. 6. A valid current or expired concealed weapon, firearm or handgun permit or license that is issued by another state or a political subdivision of another state and that has a training or testing requirement for initial issuance. 7. Completion of any governmental police agency firearms training course and qualification to carry a firearm in the course of normal police duties. 8. Completion of any other firearms safety or training course or class that is conducted by a department of public safety approved or national rifle association certified firearms instructor. O. The department of public safety shall maintain information comparing the number of permits requested, the number of permits issued and the number of permits denied. The department shall annually report this information electronically to the governor and the legislature. P. The director of the department of public safety shall adopt rules for the purpose of implementing and administering this section including fees relating to permits that are issued pursuant to this section. Q. This state and any political subdivision of this state shall recognize a concealed weapon, firearm or handgun permit or license that is issued by another state or a political subdivision of another state if both: 1. The permit or license is recognized as valid in the issuing state. 2. The permit or license holder is all of the following: (a) Legally present in this state. (b) Not legally prohibited from possessing a firearm in this state. R. For the purpose of establishing mutual permit or license recognition with other states, the department of public safety shall enter into a written agreement if another state requires a written agreement. The department of public safety shall submit an electronic report to the governor and the legislature each year that includes any changes that were made in the previous year to a written agreement with another state. S. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a person with a concealed weapons permit from another state may not carry a concealed weapon in this state if the person is under twenty-one years of age or is under indictment for, or has been convicted of, a felony offense in any jurisdiction, unless that conviction is expunged, set aside or vacated or the person's rights have been restored and the person is currently not a prohibited possessor under state or federal law. T. The department of public safety may issue certificates of firearms proficiency according to the Arizona peace officer standards and training board firearms qualification for the purposes of implementing the law enforcement officers safety act of 2004 (P.L. 108-277; 118 Stat. 865; 18 United States Code sections 926B and 926C). A law enforcement or prosecutorial agency shall issue to a qualified retired law enforcement officer who has honorably retired a photographic identification that states that the officer has honorably retired from the agency. A person who was a municipal, county or state prosecutor is deemed to meet the qualifications of 18 United States Code section 926C(c)(2). The chief law enforcement officer shall determine whether an officer has honorably retired and the determination is not subject to review. A law enforcement or prosecutorial agency has no obligation to revoke, alter or modify the honorable discharge photographic identification based on conduct that the agency becomes aware of or that occurs after the officer has separated from the agency. For the purposes of this subsection, "qualified retired law enforcement officer" has the same meaning prescribed in 18 United States Code section 926C. U. The initial and renewal application fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the concealed weapons permit fund established by section 41-1722. V. On or before July 31 of each year, the department of public safety shall report to the joint legislative budget committee on the number of concealed weapons permits issued in the prior fiscal year. The report shall also include the number of outstanding concealed weapons permit applications that have not been issued and the average turnaround time to issue a concealed weapons permit. END_STATUTE